zh-CN: 材料来源: 成品（珠宝/手表）; 散装/未镶嵌; NFT); 印刷/电子（礼品卡; 代金券）; 其他
zh-TW: 材質來源: 成品 (珠寶/手錶); 散裝/未裝載; NFT); 平面/電子 (禮品卡); 兌換券; 其他
lt-LT: Medžiagos kilmė: Gatavas produktas (papuošalai / laikrodis); Laisvas / nepritvirtintas; NFT); Spausdinta / skaitmeninė (dovanų kortelė; kuponas; Kita
sk-SK: Pôvod materiálu: Hotový výrobok (šperky/hodinky); Voľné/nenamontované; NFT); Tlačená/digitálna (darčeková karta); poukážka; Iné
nb: Materiell opprinnelse: Ferdig produkt (smykker/klokke); Løs/umontert; NFT); Trykt/digitalt (gavekort; kupong; Annet
pt-BR: Origem do material: Produto final (joia/relógio); Solto/não montado; NFT); Impresso/digital (cartão-presente; voucher; Outro
ja: 素材の形態: 完成品（ジュエリー/時計）; 緩い/マウントされていない; NFT）; 印刷/デジタル（ギフトカード; バウチャー; その他
pl: Pochodzenie materiału: Produkt gotowy (biżuteria/zegarek); Luzem/bez oprawy; NFT; Drukowany/cyfrowy (karta prezentowa); Voucher; Inne
th: แหล่งที่มาของวัสดุ: สินค้าสำเร็จรูป (เครื่องประดับ/นาฬิกา); แบบหลวม/ยังไม่ได้ประกอบ; NFT); แบบพิมพ์/ดิจิทัล (บัตรของขวัญ; บัตรกำนัล; อื่นๆ
fi: Materiaalin alkuperä: Valmis tuote (koru/kello); Irrallinen/asentamaton; NFT); Painettu/digitaalinen (lahjakortti; kuponki; Muu
hr-HR: Podrijetlo materijala: Gotovi proizvod (nakit/sat); Rasuto/nemontirano; NFT; Tiskano/digitalno (poklon-kartica); Vaučer; Ostalo
cs: Původ materiálu: Hotový výrobek (šperky/hodinky); Volné/nepřipevněné; NFT); Tištěná/digitální (dárkový; poukaz; Jiné
es: Origen del material: Producto terminado (joyería/reloj); Suelto/sin montar; NFT); Tarjeta de regalo impresa/digital; Cupón; Otros
el: Προέλευση υλικού: Τελικό προϊόν (κόσμημα/ρολόι); Χύμα / μη τοποθετημένο; NFT); Τυπωμένη / ψηφιακή (δωροκάρτα; κουπόνι; Άλλο
bg-BG: Произход на материала: Готов продукт (бижута/часовник); Централизирана/немонтирана; техника за хранителен филм (NFT); Печатна/дигитална (подаръчна карта); ваучер; Други
en: Material origin: Finished product (jewelry/watch); Loose/unmounted; NFT); Printed/digital (gift card; voucher; Other
tr: Malzemenin kökeni: Bitmiş ürün (mücevher/saat); Gevşek/monte edilmemiş; NFT); Baskılı/dijital (hediye kartı); kupon; Diğer
nl: Herkomst van het materiaal: Eindproduct (sieraden/horloge); Los/niet gemonteerd; NFT); Gedrukt/digitaal (cadeaubon; voucher; Andere
fr: Origine du matériau: Produit fini (bijou/montre); En vrac/non monté; NFT); Imprimé/numérique (carte-cadeau; Bon; Autre
it: Origine del materiale: Prodotto finito (gioiello/orologio); Sciolto/non montato; NFT); Carta regalo stampata/digitale; voucher; Altro
vi: Nguồn gốc vật liệu: Sản phẩm hoàn thiện (trang sức/đồng hồ); Lỏng lẻo/không gắn kết; NFT); In/kỹ thuật số (thẻ quà tặng; chứng từ; Khác
hu: Anyag eredete: Késztermék (ékszer/óra); Szabadon álló/foglalatlan; NFT); Nyomtatott/digitális (ajándékkártya; utalvány; Egyéb
sl-SI: Izvor materiala: Končni izdelek (nakit/ura); Ohlapno/nemontirano; NFT); Tiskano/digitalno (darilna kartica; bon; Drugo
ro-RO: Originea materialului: Produs finit (bijuterie/ceas); Demontat/slăbit; NFT); Imprimat/digital (card cadou); voucher; Altele
pt-PT: Origem do material: Produto acabado (joia/relógio); Solto/não montado; NFT); Impresso/digital (cartão de oferta); voucher; Outro
da: Materialets oprindelse: Færdigt produkt (smykker/ur); Løst/ikke monteret; NFT); Trykt/digitalt (gavekort); kupon; Andet
ru: Происхождение материала: Готовая продукция (ювелирные изделия / часы); Свободный/незакрепленный; NFT); Печатная / цифровая версия (подарочная карта; ваучер; Другой
de: Materialursprung: Fertiges Produkt (Schmuck/Uhr); Lose/unmontiert; NFT); Gedruckt/digital (Geschenkkarte); Gutschein; Sonstiges
ko: 재료 원산지: 완제품(주얼리/시계); 나석/세팅 안 함; NFT); 지면/디지털(기프트 카드; 바우처; 기타
sv: Materialets ursprung: Färdig produkt (smycken/klocka); Lös/omonterad; (NFT); Tryckt/digitalt (presentkort); kupong; Övrigt